Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6735
Facility, school, or child care facility; subject to discipline.

A facility shall be subject to discipline under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act or other relevant statutes for violation of the Medication Aide Act or the rules and regulations. A school shall be subject to discipline under Chapter 79 for violation of the Medication Aide Act or the applicable rules and regulations. A child care facility shall be subject to discipline under the Child Care Licensing Act for violation of the Medication Aide Act or the rules and regulations.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 25;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 140;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 133.

Child Care Licensing Act, see section 71-1908.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.